Florida, session 2026, SB808.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSubsection (5) and paragraph (a) of subsection 24 (6) of section 627.7011, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 25 627.7011âHomeownersâ policies; property insurance policies; 26 offer of replacement cost coverage and law and ordinance 27 coverage.â 28 (5)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âauthorized 29 inspectorâ means an inspector who is approved by the insurer and 30 who is: 31 1.âA home inspector licensed under s. 468.8314; 32 2.âA building code inspector certified under s. 468.607; 33 3.âA general, building, or residential contractor licensed 34 under s. 489.111 or a roofing contractor; 35 4.âA professional engineer licensed under s. 471.015; 36 5.âA professional architect licensed under s. 481.213; or 37 6.âA Registered Roof Consultant certified by the 38 International Institute of Building Enclosure Consultants; 39 7.âA Registered Roof Observer certified by the 40 International Institute of Building Enclosure Consultants; or 41 8.6.âAny other individual or entity recognized by the 42 insurer as possessing the necessary qualifications to properly 43 complete a general inspection of a residential structure insured 44 with a homeownerâs insurance policy. 45 (b)âAn insurer may not refuse to issue or refuse to renew a 46 property insurance homeownerâs policy insuring a residential 47 structure with a roof that is less than 15 years old solely 48 because of the age of the roof. 49 (c)1.âFor a roof that is at least 15 years old, an insurer 50 must differentiate between a low-slope roof with a 2-inch pitch 51 or less and a steep-slope roof with a pitch of more than 2 52 inches in its offer for coverage under a policy. 53 2.âBefore requiring the replacement of a steep-slope roof 54 as a condition of issuing or renewing a property insurance 55 policy, the insurer must allow a property owner homeowner to 56 have a roof inspection performed by an authorized inspector at 57 the property ownerâs homeownerâs expense before requiring the 58 replacement of the roof of a residential structure as a 59 condition of issuing or renewing a homeownerâs insurance policy. 60 3.âIf the roof is a steep-slope roof, the insurer may not 61 refuse to issue or refuse to renew a property homeownerâs 62 insurance policy solely because of roof age if an inspection of 63 the roof of the residential structure performed by an authorized 64 inspector indicates that the roof has 5 years or more of useful 65 life remaining. 66 4.âIf the roof is a low-slope roof, the insurer may not 67 refuse to issue or refuse to renew a property insurance policy 68 solely because of roof age if an authorized inspector determines 69 that the roof may be restored by having a roof coating system 70 applied which will result in the roof having 5 years or more of 71 useful life remaining. 72 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, a roofâs age shall be 73 calculated using the last date on which 100 percent of the 74 roofâs surface area was built or replaced in accordance with the 75 building code in effect at that time or the initial date of a 76 partial roof replacement when subsequent partial roof builds or 77 replacements were completed that resulted in 100 percent of the 78 roofâs surface area being built or replaced. 79 (e)âThis subsection applies to property homeownersâ 80 insurance policies issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2026 81 2022. 82 (6)âThis section does not: 83 (a)âExcept as provided in subsection (5), apply to policies 84 not considered to be âhomeownersâ policies,â as that term is 85 commonly understood in the insurance industry. 86 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.